Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,164
Administrative penalty.

The director may, in lieu of suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority, levy an administrative penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars if reasonable notice in writing is given of the intent to levy the penalty and the health maintenance organization has a reasonable time within which to remedy the defect in its operations which gave rise to the penalty citation. The director may augment a penalty by an amount equal to the sum that he or she calculates to be the damages suffered by enrollees or other members of the public.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 73.